Utah statutes.
49-12-201.   System membership -- Eligibility.

(1)  A regular full-time employee of a participating employer is eligible for service credit in this system upon the later of:

(a)  the date on which the participating employer began participating in this system; or

(b)  the effective date of employment of the regular full-time employee with the participating employer.

(2)  Beginning July 1, 1986, a person entering employment with the state and its educational institutions may not participate in this system.

(3)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection (1), a person initially entering employment with a participating employer on or after July 1, 2011, may not participate in this system.

